Massachusetts, session 194th, H1636.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18¾ of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 69
of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by striking out clauses (12) through (14) and inserting in
place thereof the following:-
(12)(i) to establish data collection and reporting standards for criminal justice agencies
and the trial court, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of
public safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and
the several district attorneys to capture and report information on their populations, including
recording all applicable charges and convictions. The secretary shall promulgate regulations
regarding: (i) the format for the submission of the data and (ii) the categories and types of data
required to be submitted, including, but not limited to: (A) a unique statewide identification
of 4

number assigned to each person who enters the criminal justice system, including but not limited
to the fingerprint-based state identification number and the probation central file number; (B) the
offense for which the person has been incarcerated; (C) the date and time of the offense, (D) the
location of the offense; (E) the race, ethnicity, gender age of the person, whether the person is a
primary caretaker of a child and the status of the person’s reproductive health needs; (F) risk and
needs assessment scores; (G) participation and completion of evidence-based programs; and (H)
dates entering and exiting the jail or the date entering the department or house of correction
custody, wrap-up release date and actual release date.
(ii) the data collected pursuant to clause (i) shall be in the form of a cross-tracking
system for data collection and reporting standards for criminal justice agencies and the trial
court, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public safety and
security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and the several district
attorneys. The cross-tracking system shall require all these agencies to use a unique state
identification number assigned to each person who enters the criminal justice system and to
incorporate the unique state identification number into their data systems upon a person’s initial
transfer to their jurisdiction. Anonymized cross-agency data shall be made available to the
public for analysis through an application programming interface which allows access to all
electronically available records.
(13) to establish data collection and reporting standards for criminal justice agencies and
the trial court, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public
safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and the
several district attorneys relative to recidivism rates for rearraignment, reconviction and
reincarceration. Recidivism rates, determined by the data collected, shall be reported annually to
of 4

the secretary. The data shall be submitted by each agency to the secretary who shall
subsequently publish the information quarterly on the executive office of public safety and
security website. Reported data shall be tracked over 1, 2 and 3 year periods and include
categorizations by race, ethnicity, gender and age.
(14) to establish data collection and reporting standards for criminal justice agencies and
the trial court, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public
safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and the
several district attorneys to standardize methods of reporting of race and ethnicity data to
facilitate assessment of the racial and ethnic composition of the criminal justice population of the
commonwealth. These agencies shall coordinate to ensure that racial and ethnic data related to
populations, trends and outcomes is reported accurately to the secretary of the executive office of
public safety and security and the public.
SECTION 2. Section 11 of chapter 7D of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 69 of
the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following:-
The board shall meet quarterly to review the compliance of criminal justice agencies and
the trial court, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public
safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction and, county jails and the
several district attorneys in: (1) collecting and submitting data required by paragraphs (12), (13)
and (14) of section 18¾ of chapter 6A; (2) making said data available to the public as required
by said paragraphs 12, 13 and 14 of said section 18¾ through the development of data portals to
make data without personally identifiable information so available; and (3) maintaining policies
of 4

ensuring accurate data collection across racial, ethnic and gender classifications; provided, that
compliance shall include a review of whether the methods of data collection are appropriately
screening for gender-specific risk or needs that may be addressed by evidence-based programs.
A report on the collection of data and the compliance with justice reinvestment policies shall be
submitted annually to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate on or before July
1.
of 4